Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 21

Uniform Law To Oppose Federal Encroachment On State Rights

25-21-101. Study of existing federal legislation.

In order to secure concerted action among the states to oppose federal encroachments upon the state powers, and to expedite the proper execution of the responsibility of the government in the war effort, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to cooperate with the attorneys general of other cooperating states in making a study of existing federal legislation to determine whether, by the establishment of federal bureaus, boards, or commissions, or otherwise, such legislation has resulted in objectionable or harmful encroachments upon the normal field of state functions and powers, and, except during the war and insofar as the legislation is reasonably related to the conduct of the war to call to the attention of this state's Senators and Representatives in Congress all legislation which, in his opinion, is objectionable or harmful in this respect. He shall also furnish each such Senator and Representative a written statement of the reasons for his belief that such legislation is objectionable or harmful to the state, together with his suggestions for appropriate congressional legislation to remedy same.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-401.

25-21-102. Study of proposed federal legislation.

It shall also be the duty of the Attorney General to likewise cooperate with such other attorneys general in making studies and examinations of all now pending or hereafter proposed congressional legislation to determine whether the same may result in federal encroachments into the normal field of state legislation or state functions, or whether same is harmful or beneficial to the interests of the state or its citizens, and to advise the Senators and Representatives in writing of his opinion and views with respect thereto, together with his reasons therefor; and to suggest any amendments to any such pending or proposed legislation which the Attorney General deems appropriate or necessary to protect the interests of the state and its citizens.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-402.

25-21-103. Investigation of federal legislation on request of Senators or Representatives.

The Attorney General shall also make any reasonable or appropriate investigation or study of any existing or proposed federal legislation to determine its effect upon the state and its citizens whenever he is requested so to do by any of this state's Senators or Representatives in Congress and report the result of such investigation or study.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-403.

25-21-104. Appointment of Deputy or Assistant Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall appoint a Deputy or Assistant Attorney General whose principal duty shall be to assist in the performance of the duties imposed by this chapter. The compensation of the Deputy or Assistant shall be paid out of the appropriation for the Attorney General's Office contained in the general appropriation act.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-404.

25-21-105. Membership in interstate organization.

The Attorney General and/or his said Deputy or Assistant is authorized to become a member of an organization now existing or hereafter formed, the membership consisting of the attorneys general of the various states, and/or their deputies or assistants, and the purpose of said organization being to bring about the joint or concerted action of said states to preserve in the states their normal powers, obligations, and functions, as provided by the Constitution of the United States. The Attorney General is authorized to pay, out of the bill of appropriations for conducting his office, this state's fair part or proportion of any proper expenses incurred by said organization in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-405.

25-21-106. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Law to Oppose Federal Encroachments”.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 166, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-406.